vi: Nhà và vườn > Phòng bếp và phòng ăn > Phụ kiện đồ dùng nhà bếp > Phụ kiện máy làm mỳ pasta: Cánh trộn; Bộ động cơ máy làm mì; Giá phơi mì ống; Đồ gá định hình; Thanh ép
da: Hjem og have > Køkken og spisestue > Køkkenapparater – tilbehør > Pastamaskine – tilbehør: Blandingspadler; Motorsæt; Pastatørrestativer; Formningstilbehør; Klemmestænger
it: Casa e giardino > Cucina e pranzo > Accessori strumenti cucina > Accessori macchina pasta: Pale di miscelazione; Kit motore; Stendipasta; Accessori per modellare; Barre di compressione
pl: Dom i ogród > Kuchnia i jadalnia > Akcesoria do sprzętów kuchennych > Akcesoria do maszynek do makaronu: Łopatki mieszające; Zestawy silników; Stojaki do suszenia makaronu; Przystawki do nadawania kształtu; Pręty ściskające
sk-SK: Dom a záhrada > Kuchyňa a jedáleň > Príslušenstvo pre kuchynské spotrebiče > Príslušenstvo na výrobu cestovín: Miešacie lopatky; Sady motora; Stojany na sušenie cestovín; Tvarovacie nadstavce; Stláčacie tyče
de: Heim & Garten > Küche & Esszimmer > Zubehör für Küchengeräte > Nudelmaschinenzubehör: Rührelemente; Motorsets; Pasta-Trockengestelle; Formgebungsaufsätze; Pressstangen
pt-PT: Casa e jardim > Cozinha e refeições > Acessórios de aparelhos domésticos > Acessórios para máquina de pasta: Pás para misturar; Kits de motor; Suportes para secagem de massa; Acessórios de forma; Barras para espremer
ru: Дом и сад > Кухня и сервировка стола > Аксессуары для кухонной техники > Аксессуары для паста-машин и лапшерезок: Лопатки для смешивания ингредиентов; Комплекты для двигателя; Сушилки для пасты; Насадки для нарезки пасты; Шнеки для паста-машин
ro-RO: Casă și grădină > Bucătărie și sufragerie > Accesorii pentru electrocasnice de bucătărie > Accesorii mașină de paste: Palete pentru amestecare; Kituri motor; Suporturi pentru uscare paste; Accesorii pentru modelare; Bare pentru strângere
nl: Huis en tuin > Keuken en eetkamer > Accessoires voor keukenmachines > Accessoires voor pastamakers: Mengpeddels; Motorkits; Droogrekken voor pasta; Hulpstukken voor vormgeven; Knijpstaven
el: Σπίτι & κήπος > Κουζίνα & τραπεζαρία > Αξεσουάρ οικιακών συσκευών > Αξεσουάρ για μηχανές ζυμαρικών: Πτερύγια ανάδευσης μίγματος; Κιτ κινητήρα; Ράφια ξήρανσης ζυμαρικών; Εξαρτήματα διαμόρφωσης; Μπάρες πίεσης
zh-TW: 居家和庭園 > 廚房與餐廳 > 廚房電器配件 > 製麵機配件: 混合槳片; 馬達套件; 麵條乾燥架; 塑形配件; 擠壓棒
zh-CN: 家居与园艺 > 厨房/餐厅 > 厨房电器配件 > 面条机配件: 搅拌棒; 电机套件; 面条干燥架; 成型附件; 挤压棒
tr: Ev ve Bahçe > Mutfak ve Yemek > Mutfak Aleti Aksesuarları > Makarna Yapma Makinesi Aksesuarları: Karıştırma Kürekleri; Motor Kitleri; Makarna Kurutma Rafları; Şekillendirme Aparatları; Sıkma Çubukları
ja: ホーム・ガーデン > キッチン・ダイニング > キッチン家電関連用品 > パスタメーカー関連用品: ミキシングパドル; モーターキット; パスタ乾燥ラック; 成形アタッチメント; 絞りだしバー
th: บ้านและสวน > ห้องครัวและการรับประทานอาหาร > อุปกรณ์เครื่องใช้ในครัว > อุปกรณ์เครื่องทำพาสต้า: ไม้นวดผสม; ชุดมอเตอร์; ราวตากเส้นพาสต้า; อุปกรณ์เสริมเครื่องทำเส้น; บาร์บีบ
cs: Dům a zahrada > Kuchyně a jídelny > Kuchyňské spotřebiče – příslušenství > Mlýnky na těstoviny – příslušenství: Míchací lopatky; Sady motorů; Stojany na sušení těstovin; Tvarovací nástavce; Stlačovací šneky
fr: Maison et jardin > Arts de la table et arts culinaires > Accessoires petit électroménager > Accessoires pour machines à pâtes: Palettes de mélange; Kit moteur; Séchoirs à pâtes; Accessoires de façonnage; Barres de compression
en: Home & Garden > Kitchen & Dining > Kitchen Appliance Accessories > Pasta Maker Accessories: Mixing Paddles; Motor Kits; Pasta Drying Racks; Shaping Attachments; Squeezing Bars
ko: 가정/원예 용품 > 주방/식탁 > 주방가전 부대용품 > 파스타 메이커 부대용품: 믹싱 패들; 모터 키트; 파스타 건조 선반; 성형 부속품; 스퀴즈 바
hr-HR: Dom i vrt > Kuhinja i blagovaonica > Pribor za kuhinjske aparate > Pribor za aparate za izradu tjestenine: Lopatice za miješanje; Motorni kompleti; Stalci za sušenje tjestenine; Nastavci za oblikovanje; Šipke za prešanje
sv: Hem och trädgård > Kök och matsal > Tillbehör till köksapparater > Tillbehör till pastamaskiner: Blandningsspadar; Motorsatser; Pastatorkställ; Formningstillbehör; Klämningsstänger
lt-LT: Namai ir sodas > Virtuvė ir valgomasis > Virtuvės prietaisų priedai > Makaronų gaminimo aparatų priedai: Maišymo mentelės; Variklių rinkiniai; Makaronų džiovinimo lentynos; Formavimo priedai; Spaudimo strypai
fi: Koti ja puutarha > Keittiö ja ruokailu > Keittiölaitteiden lisätarvikkeet > Pastakoneen lisätarvikkeet: Sekoituslevyt; Moottorisarja; Pastan kuivaustelineet; Muotoilulisäosat; Puristustangot
hu: Otthon és kert > Konyha és étkező > Konyhaigép-kiegészítők > Tésztakészítő-kiegészítők: Keverőlapátok; Motor készlet / csomag; Tésztaszárító állványok; Formázótartozékok; Szorítórudak
bg-BG: Дом и градина > Кухня и трапезария > Аксесоари за кухненски уреди > Аксесоари за машина за паста: Лопатки за смесване на тесто; Моторни комплекти; Стойки за сушене на паста; Приставки за оформяне; Тръбни приставки за изстискване на паста
pt-BR: Casa e jardim > Produtos de cozinha e aparelhos de jantar > Acessórios para eletrodomésticos de cozinha > Acessórios para máquina de massa: Pás de mistura; Kit de motor; Prateleiras para secar massas; Acessórios de moldagem; Barras de espremer
sl-SI: Dom in vrt > Kuhinja in jedilnica > Dodatki za kuhinjske aparate > Dodatki za strojčke za testenine: Mešalne lopatice; Motorni kompleti; Stojala za sušenje testenin; Priključki za oblikovanje; Palice za stiskanje
es: Casa y jardín > Cocina y comedor > Accesorios para aparatos de cocina > Accesorios para hacer pasta: Paletas para mezclar; Kits de motor; Rejillas para secar pasta; Accesorios de moldeado; Barras de exprimir
nb: Hjem og hage > Kjøkken og spiserom > Tilbehør til kjøkkenapparater > Tilbehør til pastamaskiner: Blandingspadler; Motorsett; Tørkestativer for pasta; Formingstilbehør; Klemstenger